src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AD_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲alad - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AD_STEM_2

     sg̲alad+V+Imm+Pres: sg̲alíida
     sg̲alad+V+Simp+Pres: sg̲alíidang
     sg̲alad+V+Dir+Past: sg̲alíidan
     sg̲alad+V+NonFact: sg̲alíidang
     sg̲alad+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidang
     sg̲alad+V+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidanggang
     sg̲alad+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲alíidangang
     sg̲alad+V+Dir+Past+Hab: sg̲alíidiinii
     sg̲alad+V+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲alíidaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+Indir+Past+Hab: sg̲alíidaangaan
     sg̲alad+V+Interr+Near+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaʼáa
     sg̲alad+V+Near+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaʼáang
     sg̲alad+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲alad+V+VNear+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲alad+V+Cert+Pres: sg̲alíidʼahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+Cert+Past: sg̲alíidʼahlanggan
     sg̲alad+V+Cert+Past+Hab: sg̲alíidʼahlanggiinii
     sg̲alad+V+Cert+Rel: sg̲alíidʼahlans
     sg̲alad+V+Ints+Past: sg̲alíidaaʼahlang
     sg̲alad+V+Cont: sg̲alíidaaʼahlanggaa
     sg̲alad+V+Ctfact+Pres: sg̲alíidaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+Rflx: sg̲alíidʼahl
     sg̲alad+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidangʼwaa
     sg̲alad+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidangʼwaang
     sg̲alad+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲alíidangʼwaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidangʼanggang
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲alíidangʼangang
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaaʼáng
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+Near+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaaʼánggang
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: sg̲alíidang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidangʼangʼwaa
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: sg̲alíidangʼangʼwaang
     sg̲alad+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲alíidangʼangʼwaa.ang
